apertium-chv.chv.twol
"й surfaces in иӗ > ийӗ"
%{w2%}:й <=> :и _ [ :ӗ | :и ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
! below two contexts COMBINED above:
!             :и _ :ӗ/[ %>: | :0 ] ; ! ҫи<v><tv><fut><p1><sg> = ҫийӗп
!             :и _ :и/[ %>: | :0 ] ; ! ҫи<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> = ҫийин

"р falls in front of т, м"
%{р%}:0 <=> _ [ %{Р2%}: | :т | :м ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
! кӳр<v><iv><evid><p1><sg> = кӳтӗм
! кӳр<v><iv><neg><pres><p1><sg> = кӳместӗп

!!!!! {R} phonology !!!!!

"{Р} становится т после р" 
%{Р%}:т <=> [ р | л | %{н2%}:н ] %{RUS%}:* %>: _ ;
	except _ %>: :ӗ ;

!!!! JNW TEMP
!"{Р} становится ч после р и перед ӗ: пӗтертӗ > пӗтерчӗ" 
!%{Р%}:ч <=> [ р | л | %{н2%}:н ] %{RUS%}:* %>: _ %>: :ӗ ;

"{Р} становится ч после множественного числа и {н}" 
%{Р%}:ч <=> [ %{М%}:н | %{н%}:н | ] %>: _ ;
! below two contexts COMBINED above:
!            %{М%}:н %>: _ ;
!            %{н%}:н %>: _ ;

"{Р2} становится т после л н р " 
%{Р2%}:т <=> [ р | л | н | %{р%}: ] %>: _ ;
               [ л | н ] ь %>: _ ;		! июльте, июньте
	except
             _ %>: :ӗ ҫ* .#. ;
             _ %>: :ӗ ҫ* %>: ;

"{Р2} становится ч после л н р и перед 3 sg/pl: пӗтертӗ > пӗтерчӗ" 
%{Р2%}:ч <=> [ р | л | н | %{р%}: ] %>: _ %>: :ӗ ҫ* .#. ;
             [ р | л | н | %{р%}: ] %>: _ %>: :ӗ ҫ* %>: ;

"{Т} становится т после р" 
%{Т%}:т <=> [ р | %{н2%}:н ] %>: _ ;

!!!! JNW TEMP
!"{Т} бывает т после л, ль, н, нь в РА/РАн (анализировать, но не генерировать)" 
!%{Т%}:т <=> [ л | [ л ь ] | н | [ н ь ] ]/[ %>: | %{w%}: ] _ %{А%}: ;
!! ял>{Р}{А}н:ялран(/ялтан)
!! ял>{Р}{А}:ялра

"{Т} становится т"
%{Т%}:т <=> [ [ л | н ] ь* ]/[ %>: | %{w%}: ] _ %{А%}: ;
                  ! ял>{Р}{А}:ялра
                  ! ял>{Р}{А}н:ялран(/ялтан)
            [ р | %{н2%}:н ] %>: _ ;
            %{У%}: %{н%}:н %>: _ ;
                  ! чик{ː}ӗ>{У}{н}>{Т}{А}:чиккӳнте

!! "{Р} бывает т после л, ль, н в РАн (анализировать)"              
!! %{Р%}:т <=> [ л | [ л ь ] | н ]/[ :0 ] _ %{А%}: н ;           

"{Т} становится ч после множественного числа и {н}" 
%{Т%}:ч <=> [ %{М%}:н | %{н%}:н ] %>: _ ;
! below contexts COMBINED above:
!            %{М%}:н %>: _ ;
!            %{н%}:н %>: _ ;
        except
            %{У%}: %{н%}:н %>: _ ;      ! чик{ː}ӗ>{У}{н}>{Т}{А}:чиккӳнте

!"Initial т in causative drops in front of another т"
!т:0 <=> т %>: _ %{А%}: р: ; 

"Simplification of the stem ending in Russian words finishing in double consonant" ! last consonant of words like класс and металл delete in all but the base form)
Cx:0 <=> _ Cy %{RUS%}: %>: ;
         except
         _ в: ;                  ! avoid conflict with ӑв/ӗв words
         _ й: ;                  ! avoid conflict with й deletion
         where Cx in Soglasnye
               Cy in Soglasnye
         matched ;

!!!!! JNW TEMP
!!!! "Exceptions" (maybe a paradigm will have to be created if quite more are found)
!"# ҫын # > ҫынӑ"
!! ҫын behaves as its old form ҫынӑ, but has lost the final ӑ in the non-marked form
!ӑ:0 <=> .#. ҫ ы н _ .#. ;
!        .#. ҫ ы н _ %>: с е %{М%}: ;	! also in the plural forms without person affix
!
!
!"# йӗп # > йӗпӗ"
!! ҫын behaves as йӗпӗ, but has lost the final ӗ in the non-marked form
!ӗ:0 <=> .#. й ӗ п _ .#. ;
!        .#. й ӗ п _ %>: с е %{М%}: ;	! also in the plural forms without person affix
!        _ %{RUS%}: %>: %{dup%}: %{У%}: ;

"ӗ → е at the end of Russian words"
ӗ:е <=> _ %{RUS%}:0 .#. ;

"ӑ → а at the end of Russian words"
ӑ:а <=> _ %{RUS%}:0 .#. ;

!!! Сравнение
"-тарах 1 (ӑшӑрах)"
%{А%}:0 <=> %>: %{Тарах%}:0 _ р ;
     except
	                  р %>: %{Тарах%}: _ р ;
        [ й | л | н ] %>: %{ТарахAnaliz%}: _ р ;

"+тарах 1 (йывӑртарах)"
%{Тарах%}:т <=> р %>: _ ;

"+тарах 2 (нумайтарах)"
%{ТарахAnaliz%}:т <=> [ й | л | н ] %>: _ ;

!!! Глаголы
"шыраать > шырать"
!%{а%}:0 <=> :SurVow %>: _ ;		! WARNING!!!: There's a cataclysm if this is changed to: %{а%}:0 <=> :SurVow/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
%{а%}:0 <=> :SurVow [ %{w2%}: ]* %>: _ ;	! WARNING!!!: There's a cataclysm if this is changed to: %{а%}:0 <=> :SurVow/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
            :SurVow [ %{w%}: ]* %>: _ ;  ! WARNING!!! I made this up
	except %{RUS%}: %>: _ ;		! We make explicit that this rule does not deal with Russian words, as the compiler asks for that
            [ у: | ӳ: ] [ %{w2%}: ] %>: _ ;
! шыра>{а}т>{ь}:шырать
! йӗри-тавра{w}>{а}лла:йӗри-тавралла

"3.pl: килетҫҫӗ > килеҫҫӗ, килместҫҫӗ > килмеҫҫӗ"
т:0 <=> _ %>: ҫ ҫ ӗ: ;

"3.neg.pl: килеҫҫӗ, килместҫҫӗ > килмеҫҫӗ"
с:0 <=> _ %>: т: %>: ҫ ҫ ӗ: ;


!!! Orthography

!"Remove soft sign if e is already palatalised"
!%{ь%}:0 <=>        %{А%}:е т %>: _ ;
!                        :е т %>: _ ;
!        :е :0* %>: %{а%}:0 т %>: _ ; ! итле>{а}т>{ь}:итлет
!                  :е с %>: т %>: _ ;
!                 %{А%}:е с т %>: _ ; ! ил>{а}{й}>м{А}ст>{ь}:илеймест
!             %{А%}:е с %>: т %>: _ ;
!!!! Couldn't you just make this shorter with something like this?
!!!!  :е [ :с | :т | %>: | :0 ]* _ .#. ;

"Remove soft sign if e is already palatalised"
%{ь%}:0 <=> :е [ :с | :т | %>: | :0 ]* _ .#. ;

!"а to я"
!%{а%}:я <=> й:/[ %>: | %{Ь%}: | %{RUS%}: ] _ ;

"A stuff to я after й (1)"
%{А%}:я <=>  [ :BackVow й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;		! сарай>а = сарая
             [ й: %{RUS%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;		! герой>а = героя
         except
   SurVow й: %{ː%}: ӑ: %{w%}: %>: %{н%}:  _ ;		! вӑйӑ>а = вӑййа
                               %{Тарах%}: _ р ;
                         %{ТарахAnaliz%}: _ р ;

"A stuff to я after й (2)"
%{а%}:я <=>  [ :BackVow й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;		! сарай>а = сарая
             [ й: %{RUS%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;		! герой>а = героя
         except
          SurVow й: ӑ: %{w%}: %>: %{н%}:  _ ;		! вӑйӑ>а = вӑййа
                               %{Тарах%}: _ р ;
                         %{ТарахAnaliz%}: _ р ;
                 :SurVow [ %{w2%}: ]* %>: _ ;		! Silly, but the compiler asks for this exception because of rule "шыраать > шырать"

"й>{У} = >ю (1)"
%{У%}:ю <=> [ :BackVow й: :0* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;	! сарай>у = сараю
       [ :BackVow й: %{RUS%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;	! герой>у = герою
        [ й: %{ӑ%}: %{RUS%}:  ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;	! аллей%{ӑ%}%{RUS%}>у = аллею
    [ %{ъ%}: %{ӑ%}: %{RUS%}:  ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;	! Жен%{ъ%}%{ӑ%}%{RUS%}>у = Женю
	except :BackVow й: ӑ: %>: %{dup%}: _ ;		! вӑйӑ>у = вӑййу


!!!!! JNW TEMP
!! Rules for correcting orthography to the words we changed in lexc
"Final unstressed а in Russian loans"
%{ӑ%}:а <=> _ (%{RUS%}:) .#. ;
! below contexts COMBINED above:
!            _ .#. ; 
!            _ %{RUS%}: .#. ;
	except
          :Glasnye/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;  ! avoid conflict with "Delete {ӑ} after a vowel"
          [ й: | %{ъ%}: ] _ ;
! below contexts COMBINED above:
!          [ й: | %{ъ%}: ] _ .#. ;
!          [ й: | %{ъ%}: ] _ %{RUS%}: .#. ;

!"Final unstressed е in Russian loans"
!%{Ӗ%}:е <=> _ (%{RUS%}:) .#. ;
!! below contexts COMBINED above:
!!            _ .#. ; 
!!            _ %{RUS%}: .#. ;
!
!"Final й in Russian loans finishing in ий (lost in derivate forms)"
!%{й%}:й <=> _ (%{RUS%}:) .#. ;
!!            _ .#. ; 
!!            _ %{RUS%}: .#. ;

!!!! JNW TEMP
!"й+ю,я,е = ю,я,е"
!й:0 <=> _ [ %>: | :0 ]* [ :ю | :я | :е ] ;	! сарай>у = сараю, сарай>а = сарая, чей>е = чее
!	_ %{ӑ%}: %{RUS%}: .#. ;			! аллей%{ӑ%}%{RUS%}

"%{ъ%}+ю,я = ю,я"
%{ъ%}:0 <=> _ :0* [ :ю | :я ] ;		! Жен%{ъ%}%{ӑ%}>у = Женю
					! мен%{ъ%}у = меню
            _ %{ӑ%}:я ;
!            _ %{ӑ%}:я .#. ;

"%{ъ%}+и (1)"
%{ъ%}:0 <=> _ [ %>: | :0 ]* :и ;	! Жен%{ъ%}%{ӑ%}>%{ӗ%} = Жени
	except
!         ь: _ [ %>: | :0 ]* :и ;	! Наталь%{ъ%}%{ӑ%}>%{ӗ%} = Наталйи
! SIMPLIFIED as:
          ь: _ ;
                                  
"%{ъ%}+и (2)"
%{ъ%}:0 <=> ь: _ [ %>: | :0 ]* :и ;	! Наталь%{ъ%}%{ӑ%}>%{ӗ%} = Наталйи
            :н _ [ %>: | :0 ]* %{ӑ%}: ;     ! Ван{ъ}{ӑ}{RUS}>{ӑ}н = Ванӑн

"%{ъ%}+у"
у:ю  <=> %{ъ%}: _ %{RUS%}: ;				! мен%{ъ%}у%{RUS%}  = меню
	except  _ %{RUS%}: %>: %{dup%}: %{У%}: ;	! кенгуру<n><px2sg><nom> = кенгуру{RUS}>{dup}{У}{н2} = кенгур·у
!                _ %{w%}:в ;		! меню<n><gen> = меньӑвӑн
!                _ %{w2%}:в ;

! Check me
"%{ъ%}%{ӑ%} to я word-finally"
%{ӑ%}:я <=> %{ъ%}: _ (:0) .#. ;

"ьь=ь"
ь:0 <=> _ %{ъ%}:ь ;			! Наталь%{ъ%}%{ӑ%}%{w%}%>%{Ӑ%}н = Натальӑн

!!!! JNW TEMP
!"аллей{ӑ} > аллея"
!%{ӑ%}:я <=> [ й: | %{ъ%}: ] _ %{RUS%}:* .#. ;
!! below contexts COMBINED above:
!!                й: _ %{RUS%}:* .#. ;
!!            %{ъ%}: _ %{RUS%}:* .#. ;		! Жен%{ъ%}{ӑ}

!!!! JNW TEMP
!"аллей{ӑ}·ах > аллейах"
!%{ӑ%}:0 <=>  _ %{RUS%}: %>: [ %{а%}: | %{Ӑdel%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
!! below contexts COMBINED above:
!!             _ %{RUS%}: %>: %{а%}:/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
!!             _ %{RUS%}: %>: %{Ӑdel%}:/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
!	except    _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: [ [ %{в%}: ӗ: ] | [ %{У%}: ] ] ;
!! below contexts COMBINED above:
!!               _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: %{ӗ%}: ;
!!               _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{У%}: ;



!!!!! JNW TEMP
!"ю → й in юV → йӑвV"
!ю:й <=> _ %{w%}: %>: [ %{Ӑ%}: | %{А%}: | %{У%}: | %{ӗ%}: ] ;
!        _ %>: %{dup%}: (%{в%}:) [ %{Ӑ%}: | %{А%}: | %{У%}: | %{ӗ%}: ] ;
!
!"{w} → ӑ in юV → йӑвV"
!%{w%}:ӑ <=> ю:й _ %>: [ %{Ӑ%}: | %{А%}: | %{У%}: | %{ӗ%}: ] ;
!
!"%> → ӑ in юV → йӑвV"
!%>:ӑ <=> ю:й _ %{dup%}: [ %{Ӑ%}: | %{А%}: | %{У%}: | %{ӗ%}: ] ;
!!!! хӑю<n><px1sg><nom> → хӑю>{dup}{Ӑ}м → хӑйӑвӑм
!
!"%> → в in юV → йӑвV"
!%>:в <=> ю:й %{w%}:ӑ _ [ %{Ӑ%}: | %{А%}: | %{У%}: ] ;
!
!"{dup} → в in юV → йӑвV"
!%{dup%}:в <=> ю:й %>:ӑ _ [ %{Ӑ%}: | %{А%}: | %{У%}: ] ;
!!!! хӑю<n><px1sg><nom> → хӑю>{dup}{Ӑ}м → хӑйӑвӑм
!!!! хӑю<n><px2sg><nom> → хӑю>{dup}{У}{н2} → хӑйӑву
!
!"{dup} → ӑ in юV → йӑвV"
!%{dup%}:ӑ <=> ю:й %>: _ %{в%}: %{ӗ%}: %{н%}: ;
!!!! хӑю<n><px3sg><nom> → хӑю>{dup}{в}{ӗ}{н} → хӑйӑвӗ


!!!!! Orthography tricks !!!!!

"й deletion"  !!  "in words ending in ий if not followed by a vowel" / "before yoticised vowels"
й:0 <=> :и _ .#. ;                          ! шӑший:шӑши
!        :и _ [ :Soglasnye | %{ӑ%}: ]/:0 ;   ! шӑший:%{Т%}%{А%}:шӑшире
        :и _ [ :Soglasnye ]/:0 ;   ! шӑший:%{Т%}%{А%}:шӑшире
         _ [ %>: | :0 ]* [ :ю | :я | :е ] ; ! сарай>у = сараю, сарай>а = сарая, чей>е = чее
        except
        _ ӑ:ю в:0 ;  ! avoid conflict with йӑв:ю


!!!! ӗв/ӑв ~ ӳ/у alternations !!!!!

"в deletion in words ending in ӑв/ӗв"
в:0 <=> [ ӗ: | ӑ: ] _ .#. ;
        [ ӗ: | ӑ: ] _ :Soglasnye/:0 ;
    except
        _ %{block%}:0 ;     ! хӗв{block}:хӗв, хӗв{block}>{Т}{А}:хӗвре
        _ %{RUS%}:0 ;       ! avoid conflict with Russian stem simplification, e.g. сс:с and лл:л

"ӗ/ӑ to ӳ/у in words ending in ӑв/ӗв"
Vx:Vy <=> _ в:0 ;
      except
         _ :SurVow/:0 ;      ! avoid conflict with ӑ/ӗ dropping before vowels
         %{ː%}:Soglasnye _ ; ! avoid conflict with ӑ/ӗ deletion after gemination
         _ %{Ӗ%}:и/:0 ;      ! avoid conflict with ӑ/ӗ deletion before {Ӗ}:и
         й: _ ;              ! to get ю
      where Vx in ( ӗ ӑ )
            Vy in ( ӳ у )
      matched ;

"ӑ to ю in йӑв to ю"
ӑ:ю <=> й: _ в:0 ;

"й deletion in йӑв to ю"
й:0 <=> _ ӑ:ю в:0 ;
